DI-196
DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

DIC2M-03

DTC P0560 | System Voltage

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The battery supplies electricity to the engine control ECU even when the ignition switch is OFF. This electric-
ity allows the engine control ECU store data such as DTC history, freeze frame data, fuel trim values, and
other data.

If the battery voltage falls below a minimum level, the engine control ECU will conclude that there is a fault

in the power supply circuit. The next time the engine starts, the engine control ECU will turn on the MIL and
a DTC will be set.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

*Openinback —uppowersource circuit
Open in back up power source circuit P PP

P0560 BATT is less than 3.5 V *EFI 9r ECDNo.1fuse
* Engine control ECU

HINT:
If DTC P0560 present, the engine control ECU will not store another DTC.

WIRING DIAGRAM

Engine Control

Engine Room J/B ECU
C—
- 1 EFl or ECD No.13 o 1 . 5 3 AT
-G 10 fo~o 1B IGIK—"2 3T B-R (&1 P

F37
% MAIN | FBlock

Battery

Lo il

|

A21371

2UZ-FEENGINE SUP (RM1113E)



DI-197
DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

Read freeze frame data using the hand-held tester. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions when
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, if the air-fuel ratio was lean or rich, as well as other
data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

1 Check EFI or ECD No. 1 fuse of engine room J/B.

Engine Room J/B PREPARATION:
Qe /™ Remove the EFI or ECD No. 1 fuse from the engine room J/B.
O 1O CHECK:
i DQ%%D%[:J Check the continuity of the EFIl or ECD No. 1 fuse.
oo pU OK:
Db DDDDDHDDDDDDDU Continuity
i1 (L1 CJooogyo ooooooo
ol NG Check for short in all harness and components
N < EI‘:TL;ECLDEFNFO.IT,Fuse Ato976 > connected to EFl or ECD No. 1 fuse.

@

2 | Check voltage between terminal BATT and E1 of engine control ECU connector.

CHECK:
(ED BATT (+) ED Measure the voltage between terminals of the E9 and E11 en-
E1() gine control ECU connector.
i'_lTTuTu' [:P NENEN AN ||’u{' OK:
FHH R Tester Connection Specified Condition
_‘!_1 0 T l‘l'lllll L (1] ?
W \L& \W( BATT (E11 -3) - E1 (E9 -1) 9t0 14V
Engine Control ECU OK \ | Check for intermittent problems (See page
P _A19521 Connector A19629 DI-3).

@
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3 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine control ECU
1 fuse, EFlorECD No.

and EFlor ECD No.

1 fuse and battery.

Engine Room J/B
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Check the harness and the connector between the EFI or
ECDNo. 1 fuseandtheenginecontrol ECU:

PREPARATION:
(@ Remove the EFl or ECD No. 1 fuse from the engine room
J/B.

(b) Disconnect the E11 engine control ECU connector.

CHECK:

Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tor.

OK:
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BATT

Engine Control ECU
Connector

OK

Tester Connection

Engine Room J/B (EFI or ECD No. 1
fuseterminal2) -
BATT (E11 -3)

Engine Room J/B (EFI or ECD No. 1

fuse terminal 2) or
BATT (E11 -3) - Body ground

Check the harness and connector between the EFl or ECD

No. 1 fuseandthe battery:

PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the EFl or ECD No. 1 fuse from the engine room
J/B.

(b) Disconnect the battery positive terminal.

CHECK:

Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-

tor.

OK:

Specified Condition

Below1 Q

10k Q orhigher

Tester Connection

Engine Room J/B (EFI or ECD No. 1
fuseterminal1) -
Battery positive terminal

Engine Room J/B (EFI or ECD No. 1
fuse terminal 1) or
Battery positiveterminal - Body ground

e )

Specified Condition

Below1 Q

10k Q orhigher

Repair or replace harness or connector.

Check and replace engine room J/B.
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